Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.034

Amendment—Approval criteria.

Following the close of the public comment period and any public hearing required by chapter 34.05 RCW, the state building code council shall approve or disapprove the final adoption or amendment of codes of statewide application.

(1) Proposals must meet one or more of the criteria in RCW 19.27.032 to be considered for approval.

(2) Proposals that do not meet these criteria may be considered in a future three-year code adoption cycle.

(3) The council may not adopt a proposal that is substantially different from the proposal made available for public testimony except as provided by RCW 34.05.340.

[ 2024 c 170 s 8.]